Idaho, session 2026, H0708.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 32, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-3204C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-3204C. AUTOMATIC DISSOLUTION OF HOMEOWNER'S ASSOCIATIONS. (1) Any
homeowner's association that has been in existence for ten (10) years or
more, pursuant to the date of filing of the articles of incorporation, as
of July 1, 2026, shall automatically dissolve on July 1, 2029, unless its
members vote against such dissolution pursuant to the provisions of this
section. Any homeowner's association that has been in existence for less
than ten (10) years as of July 1, 2026, or that is created after July 1, 2026,
shall automatically dissolve after ten (10) years from the date of filing of
the articles of incorporation unless its members vote against such dissolu-
tion pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(2) A homeowner's association shall hold a meeting of its membership
before the automatic dissolution dates provided for in subsection (1) of
this section to provide an opportunity for its members to vote against
the automatic dissolution of the homeowner's association. A homeowner's
association shall give notice to its members of the proposed meeting in ac-
cordance with the provisions of section 30-30-505, Idaho Code. The notice
shall state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is
to consider the automatic dissolution of the homeowner's association and
shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a plan of dissolution.
Automatic dissolution of a homeowner's association shall not occur if a ma-
jority of the eligible voters vote against such automatic dissolution.
(3) Unless otherwise provided for in the declaration or governing doc-
uments, all common property, including common areas, limited common areas,
other property or improvements owned or maintained by a homeowner's associa-
tion, or property owned in common by the members of a homeowner's association
shall remain dedicated to the common use of the members of the homeowner's
association. The plan of dissolution shall provide for the disposition of
the assets of a homeowner's association by transfer to a successor entity,
the lot owners, or a local government.
(4) If members of a homeowner's association do not vote against the au-
tomatic dissolution of the homeowner's association, the homeowner's asso-
ciation shall dissolve pursuant to the plan of dissolution. If members of a


homeowner's association vote against the automatic dissolution of the home-
owner's association, the homeowner's association shall continue under the
same terms. Homeowner's associations shall automatically dissolve ten (10)
years after the date of the first successful vote against automatic disso-
lution. Automatic dissolution shall occur every ten (10) years thereafter
while a homeowner's association is in existence unless and until the members
fail to vote against such dissolution and the homeowner's association is au-
tomatically dissolved as provided in this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.